Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-446
Workplace Safety Consultation Program Cash Fund; created; termination.

There is hereby created the Workplace Safety Consultation Program Cash Fund. The fund terminates on July 18, 2026, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on such date to the General Fund.

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 36;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 37;

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 180, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 34;

Laws 2026, LB397, § 4.
July 18, 2026